Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1506.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5912. Communications services for inmates in State or county correctional institutions.(a) Requirements.--The department and counties shall provide to all persons in their custody and confined in a State correctional institution or a county correctional institution, as applicable, voice communication services as follows:(1) The department and counties must maintain no less than the access to voice communication services and other communication services as was allowed by them on January 1, 1234567891011121314151617 2024.(2) The department and counties must maintain a 10-to-1 ratio of persons in custody to operable voice communication devices in each housing unit or recreational yard with at least two voice communication devices inside each housing unit.(b) Optional additional communications services.--The department and counties may voluntarily supplement the voice communication services with other communication services, including video communication and email or messaging services.(c) Prohibition on fees and charges.--(1) Voice communication services and other communication services shall be provided free of charge to an inmate.(2) A service, whether initiated or received through a voice communication service or other communication service, shall be free of charge to the person initiating or receiving the communication.(d) Prohibition on revenue and commissions.--The department and counties shall be prohibited from charging an inmate for use of or access to a communication service, device or system.(e) Prohibition of replacing visits.--(1) Voice communications services and other communication services may not be used to replace an in-person visit program.(2) Nothing in this section shall authorize or permit the department or county to limit or prohibit in-person contact visits.(f) Funding.--(1) Money appropriated by the General Assembly to the department for the purpose of supporting the cost of 20250HB1506PN1764 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providing voice communications services or other communication services to inmates in State correctional institutions or county correctional institutions:(i) May not be used for indirect expenses related to the provision of the voice communications services or other communication services.(ii) May only be disbursed for eligible costs accompanied by invoiced expenses from a communication service vendor.(2) From money appropriated to the department for the purpose specified in paragraph (1), 30% shall be allocated to counties on a proportional basis calculated on a per capita inmate population in county correctional institutions.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Other communication services." Communication services other than voice communication services, including video calls and electronic messages."Voice communication services." Real-time, audio-only communication services, namely telephone calls made over wireline telephony, voice over Internet protocol or any other technology infrastructure.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1506PN1764 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324